Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2030.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5804YH (1) 91 dg/ko H.F. 2030 Section 1. Section 237A.13, subsection 5, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 5. The departmentâs billing and payment provisions for 3 the program shall allow providers to elect either biweekly or 4 monthly billing and payment for child care provided under based 5 on the number of hours of child care scheduled for a child 6 enrolled in the program. The department shall remit payment 7 to a provider within ten business days of receiving a bill 8 or claim for services provided . However, if the department 9 determines that a bill has an error or omission, the department 10 shall notify the provider of the error or omission and identify 11 any correction needed before issuance of payment to the 12 provider. The department shall provide the notice within five 13 business days of receiving the billing from the provider and 14 shall remit payment to the provider within ten business days of 15 receiving the corrected billing. 16